Idaho, session 2025, S1114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-2602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2602. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, these terms shall have
the following meanings:
(1) "Aerial common fireworks" means fireworks that are launched into
the air above a height of twenty (20) feet, either by their own propulsion or
by being shot from a mortar.
(1) (2) "Authority having jurisdiction" means a city fire department
if the area is within a city, or a fire protection district formed pursuant
to provisions of the Idaho Code if the area is within a fire protection dis-
trict, or the county commission if the area is not within a city or fire pro-
tection district.
(2) (3) "Department" means the department of insurance, division of the
state fire marshal.
(3) (4) "Fireworks" means any combustible or explosive composition, or
any substance or combination of substances, or article prepared for the pur-
pose of producing a visible or audible effect by combustion, explosion, de-
flagration or detonation. Fireworks include items classified as common or
special fireworks by the United States bureau of explosives or contained in
the regulations of the United States department of transportation and desig-
nated as UN 0335 1.3G or UN 0336 1.4G. The term "fireworks" shall not include
any automotive safety flares, toy guns, toy cannons, caps or other items de-
signed for use with toy guns or toy cannons, party poppers, pop-its or other
devices which contain twenty-five hundredths (.25) of a grain or less of ex-
plosive substance.
(4) (5) "Importer" means any person who, for any purpose other than per-
sonal use, or a use associated with a specific public display or other event
permit, is the first receiver of any fireworks in this state.
(5) (6) "License" means a nontransferable, formal authorization, is-
sued by the department to engage in the acts of importing fireworks into this
state or operating a wholesale fireworks business within this state.


(6) (7) "Nonaerial common fireworks" means any fireworks such as ground
spinners, fountains, sparklers, smoke devices or snakes designed to remain
on or near the ground and not to travel outside a fifteen (15) foot diam-
eter circle or emit sparks or other burning material which land outside a
twenty (20) foot diameter circle or above a height of twenty (20) feet. Non-
aerial common fireworks do not include firecrackers, jumping jacks, or simi-
lar products.
(7) (8) "Permit" means an authorization given by the authority having
jurisdiction pursuant to section 39-2604 or 39-2605, Idaho Code.
(8) (9) "Special fireworks" means any fireworks designed primarily for
display and classified as special fireworks by the United States bureau of
explosives or designated as UN 0335 1.3G.
(9) (10) "Wholesale" means sale of fireworks to a retailer or whole-
saler.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-2603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2603. WHOLESALE AND IMPORT LICENSE REQUIRED. (1) A license shall be
required for any person to import fireworks into this state or to operate a
wholesale fireworks business in this state.
(2) Fireworks shall only be delivered in this state by a person with a
valid wholesale or import license under the following circumstances:
(a)(i) To a person with a valid sales tax seller's permit issued
pursuant to section 63-3620, Idaho Code; and
(ii) During a period beginning sixty (60) days prior to a date on
which the retail sale or use of aerial and nonaerial common fire-
works is authorized under this chapter; or
(b) To a person with a valid permit issued pursuant to section 39-2605,
Idaho Code, within a reasonable time period before the display or event.
(3) Possession of a wholesale or import license does not authorize the
holder of the license to sell aerial and nonaerial common fireworks at re-
tail, but a wholesaler or importer may also hold a retail permit in compli-
ance with the provisions of this chapter.
(4) Wholesale or import licenses shall be issued for a twelve (12) month
period beginning on March 31 each year and shall be nontransferable. The li-
cense shall be issued if the application is complete and in compliance with
applicable law.
(5) Wholesale or import license applications shall be on a form ap-
proved by the department and shall include the name and address of the
applicant (or the names of all partners, if a partnership, the name of the
corporation and the corporate officers if a corporation, or the name of the
limited liability company and all of its members, if a limited liability com-
pany) the primary location of the business, each location at which fireworks
are to be stored and the applicant's Idaho sales tax seller's permit number,
if applicable.
(6) A bond or valid certificate of public liability and property-casu-
alty insurance providing coverage of at least one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for personal injury and property damage shall be presented at the
time of application.


(7) The department may impose a fee for issuing a license under this
section which shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).
(8) The license required under this section may be revoked if the li-
censee violates any provisions of this chapter. A license revocation pro-
ceeding shall comply with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(9) The license shall be displayed in public view at each location
listed on the license.
(10) An importer or wholesaler shall keep a record of all wholesale
transactions showing the name, address, sales tax seller's permit number, if
applicable, and type and quantity of items sold.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-2604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2604. PERMIT REQUIRED FOR RETAIL SALES. (1) The local authority
having jurisdiction may require a permit for the retail sale of aerial and
nonaerial common fireworks.
(2) If a permit is required the applications shall be on a form approved
by the authority having jurisdiction and shall include the name and address
of the applicant (or the names of all partners, if a partnership, the name of
the corporation and the corporate officers if a corporation, or the name of
the limited liability company and all of its members, if a limited liability
company) the primary location of the business, each location at which fire-
works are to be stored and the applicant's Idaho sales tax seller's permit
number, if applicable.
(3) A bond or valid certificate of public liability and property-ca-
sualty insurance providing coverage of up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for personal injury and property damage may be required at the
time of application.
(4) The authority having jurisdiction may assess a fee for issuing
a permit under this section which shall not exceed twenty-five dollars
($25.00).
(5) The permit shall be issued if the application is complete and in
compliance with applicable law, shall be valid for twelve (12) months from
the date of issuance and shall be nontransferable.
(6) The permit required under this section may be revoked if the permit-
tee violates any provisions of this chapter. A permit revocation proceeding
shall comply with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(7) The permit shall be displayed in public view at the location listed
on the permit.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-2605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2605. PERMIT REQUIRED FOR PUBLIC DISPLAY OR OTHER EVENT USING FIRE-
WORKS. (1) The authority having jurisdiction may, at its discretion, issue a
permit for public display or other events in the following circumstances:
(a) After determining that the public display will be supervised by a
qualified person and will not constitute an unreasonable hazard to per-
sons or property. Appropriate national fire protection association or


international fire code provisions may be used as guidance for this de-
termination.
(b) After determining that sales and use of fireworks outside the
normal sales period provided in section 39-2606, Idaho Code, or propos-
ing the use of fireworks in addition to aerial and nonaerial common
fireworks will not constitute an unreasonable hazard to persons or
property.
(2) An application for a permit for public display or other event shall
be on a form approved by, and contain the information reasonably requested
by, the authority having jurisdiction.
(3) The permit shall be nontransferable, shall list the specific date
or dates upon which the display or event shall occur and the types of fire-
works and uses that will be allowed.
(4) A bond or valid certificate of public liability and property-casu-
alty insurance providing coverage of up to one million dollars ($1,000,000)
for personal injury and property damage may be required at the time of appli-
cation for public display of special fireworks.
(5) The authority having jurisdiction may assess a fee for issuing a
permit for public display under this section which shall not exceed one hun-
dred twenty-five dollars ($125). There shall be no fee for the issuance of a
permit for any event other than a public display event.
(6) Alteration of fireworks may be performed by a person in possession
of a valid public display permit.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-2606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2606. AUTHORIZED DATES FOR THE SALE AND USE OF FIREWORKS. (1)
Nonaerial Aerial and nonaerial common fireworks may be sold at retail and
used beginning at midnight June 23, and ending at midnight July 5 and begin-
ning at midnight December 26 and ending at midnight January 1. The authority
having jurisdiction may at its discretion extend each period of sales by not
more than five (5) days.
(2) Fireworks may be sold and used at any time in compliance with per-
mits issued under the provisions of section 39-2605, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-2607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2607. TEMPORARY FIREWORKS STANDS. Retail sales of aerial and non-
aerial common fireworks shall be allowed only from within a temporary fire-
works stand unless the authority having jurisdiction finds appropriate cir-
cumstances justifying reasonable variance from strict compliance with this
section. An existing permanent building which was used for the retail sale
of fireworks in 1996 may continue to be used for that purpose if the building
meets or exceeds the standards for temporary buildings established by this
section and is operated, insofar as it is applicable, as provided by this
section. Temporary fireworks stands shall be subject to the following pro-
visions:


(1) A stand shall not be located within twenty-five (25) feet of any
building or within one hundred (100) feet of the nearest fuel dispensing de-
vice.
(2) A stand shall meet the minimum structural stability requirements
for temporary buildings as required by applicable local building codes. If
no local building codes have been adopted, applicable state codes may be
used.
(3) A stand shall meet the minimum requirements for temporary buildings
for all lighting circuits or other electrical equipment used in conjunction
with the operation of the stand as required by applicable local building
codes or, if no local building codes have been adopted, by applicable state
codes.
(4) A stand shall have two (2) exits, each a minimum of thirty (30)
inches wide at each end of the stand or as near the ends as is practical
in a mobile home conversion. One (1) additional door is required for each
thirty-two (32) feet of rear wall in excess of thirty-two (32) feet. All
doors shall open outward from the stand and shall be kept unlocked and un-
latched during the hours of operation and free and clear of supplies and
materials at all times.
(5) A stand shall have at least two (2) fire extinguishers with a 2A min-
imum rating, in good working order, with a current inspection tag in place,
placed near the exits in a visible and readily accessible manner.
(6) "No smoking within 25 feet" signs shall be prominently displayed on
all four (4) sides of the stand. Smoking shall not be permitted inside the
stand.
(7) A stand shall not be erected before May 5 nor remain up after July
20 for the first sales period; nor shall it be erected before December 7 or
remain up after January 16 for the second sales period. The premises on which
the stand is erected shall be cleared of all structures and debris no later
than July 20 or January 16, respectively.
(8) The fireworks stand operator shall not permit the discharge of
fireworks within twenty-five (25) feet of the stand.
(9) The stand operator shall not allow any rubbish to accumulate in or
around the stand causing a fire nuisance.
(10) Only noncombustible waste containers shall be permitted within the
stand.
(11) Fireworks shall not be left in the stand when it is not open for
business unless the stand is locked or secured. If fireworks are not stored
in the stand they shall be stored in compliance with section 39-2608, Idaho
Code.
(12) Notice as provided by the authority having jurisdiction caution-
ing each person purchasing fireworks of the prohibitions, liabilities and
penalties incorporated in this chapter shall be posted at all retail loca-
tions.
(13) The authority having jurisdiction may charge a one (1) time inspec-
tion fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for inspection of a temporary fire-
works stand.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-2608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


39-2608. SHORT-TERM STORAGE. (1) A short-term storage facility may be
used for the storage of aerial and nonaerial common fireworks for a period of
sixty (60) days prior to, and fifteen (15) days after, any authorized retail
sales date. The authority having jurisdiction shall be notified of the ad-
dress or location of all short-term storage facilities when fireworks will
not be stored in a temporary fireworks stand. If the short-term storage fa-
cility is not within the boundaries of the jurisdiction having issued the re-
tail sales permit the permittee shall notify the authority having jurisdic-
tion where the storage is to take place.
(2) Short-term storage is allowed in any of the following, provided
it is locked or otherwise secured: a temporary fireworks stand, truck,
trailer, or other vehicle. A truck, trailer or other vehicle used for
short-term storage must remain at least twenty-five (25) feet from the stand
during any time the stand is open for business, but may abut the stand when it
is closed. A truck, trailer or vehicle used for short-term storage must be at
least twenty-five (25) feet from any other inhabited building. Short-term
storage may occur in a locked or secured shed, garage, barn or other building
or storage container which is detached from an inhabited building and con-
tains no open flames, including heating and lighting sources. The authority
having jurisdiction may, in its discretion, allow short-term storage to oc-
cur in an attached garage with a one (1) hour fire wall separating the garage
from any inhabited area.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.